Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 6 CORONER
30-10-619. Conflicts of interest of county coroners.

A coroner who owns, operates, is employed by, or otherwise has an interest in a funeral establishment is deemed to have a conflict of interest and shall not direct business to such establishment when performing his or her duties under this part 6.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a person from taking the body of the deceased to a funeral establishment in which the coroner has an interest if such person decides to do so without the suggestion of the coroner.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if an emergency situation exists and the coroner acts in good faith to prevent a health hazard.

Any person who knowingly violates subsection (1) of this section commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

This section shall apply to county coroners who take office after the general election in 1982.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 833, § 13, effective June 8.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1542, § 287, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1924, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3248, § 500, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

30-10-620. Corneal tissue - taking authorized. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1443, § 1, effective June 12.

L. 82:

(3)(a) R&RE, p. 482, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 12, § 1, effective March 13.

30-10-621. Removal of pituitary gland - authorization. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1057, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1097), ch. 95, p. 303, § 2, effective April 4.

30-10-622. Unidentified human remains - DNA samples.

If a coroner or medical examiner takes legal custody of unidentified human remains pursuant to section 24-80-1302 (2), C.R.S., or section 30-10-606 (1.2), the coroner or medical examiner shall:

Make reasonable attempts to identify the remains pursuant to section 16-2.7-104 (2), C.R.S.; and

Ensure that information concerning the physical appearance and structure of the unidentified human remains, including DNA typing information, is entered into the national crime information center database pursuant to section 16-2.7-104 (3), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 396, § 2, effective April 6.

30-10-623. Department of corrections - reimbursement for expenses of coroner.

The department of corrections, from appropriations made by the general assembly, shall reimburse a county for reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the county coroner related to investigations or complete autopsies performed on persons in the custody of the department of corrections. Costs may include transportation, refrigeration, and body bags. The county shall certify these costs to the department, and, upon the approval of the executive director of the department or the executive director's designee, the department shall pay the costs.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1406), ch. 150, p. 448, § 1, effective July 1.

30-10-624. Required toxicology screening for a suicide, overdose death, or accidental death - annual report - working group.

The association representing coroners shall establish a working group to study methods to test for all scheduled drugs and the presence and quantity of THC, including and identifying how long ago the THC was consumed, if the presence of THC was in conjunction with alcohol and scheduled drugs, and its metabolite in each case of a non-natural death, excluding homicide, of a person under twenty-five years of age. The working group shall consult with an epidemiologist, a medical toxicologist, an addiction specialist, and a medical examiner or forensic pathologist and may consult with the department of public health and environment. The methodology shall include means to identify prescription drugs, and other federally scheduled substances that have a substantial potential for overdose and addiction, by using evidence-based practices. These recommendations shall be completed by July 1, 2022; except that the methodology to identify prescription drugs, and other federally scheduled substances that have a substantial potential for overdose and addiction, by using evidence-based practices shall be completed by November 1, 2022, and reported to the house of representatives health and insurance committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees.

Beginning January 1, 2022, the coroner shall complete a full toxicology screen, including testing for the presence of THC, alcohol, and scheduled drugs, in each case of a non-natural death, excluding homicide, of a Colorado resident under twenty-five years of age. Upon request of a county, the department of public health and environment shall reimburse a coroner for the costs associated with completing a toxicology screen. In addition, at the request of a county, the department of public health and environment or the local health department may provide training and supplies for toxicology draws.

The coroner shall share the information collected pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section with the department of public health and environment for inclusion into the violent death reporting system. However, the information collected by the coroner and shared with the department is not a public record under the "Colorado Open Records Act"; except that the information shall be made available to a parent or a duly appointed legal representative of the deceased upon request. The department shall make the de-identified aggregate of the information provided pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) available for research purposes.

In the event of a death in a hospital, if clinically indicated, the hospital-treating clinician shall order the toxicology screen as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section and document the results of the toxicology screen to the health information exchange in the medical record.

The department of public health and environment shall produce an annual report of the information reported in subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c) of this section beginning January 2, 2023, and annually each year thereafter. The report can be produced in conjunction with the report required pursuant to section 25-3-126.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1317), ch. 313, p. 1914, § 4, effective June 24.